Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.760

Supported employment—State agency participation.

State agencies are encouraged to participate in supported employment activities. The department of social and health services, in conjunction with the department of personnel and the office of financial management, shall identify agencies that have positions and funding conducive to implementing supported employment. An agency may only participate in supported employment activities pursuant to this section if the agency is able to operate the program within its existing budget. These agencies shall:

(1) Designate a coordinator who will be responsible for information and resource referral regarding the agency's supported employment program. The coordinator shall serve as a liaison between the agency and the department of personnel regarding supported employment;

(2) Submit an annual update to the department of social and health services, the department of personnel, and the office of financial management. The annual update shall include: A description of the agency's supported employment efforts, the number of individuals placed in supported employment positions, and an overall evaluation of the effectiveness of supported employment for the agency.

[ 1999 c 178 s 3; 1997 c 287 s 3.]

NOTES:

Finding—1997 c 287: See note following RCW 41.04.750.